Utah statutes.
63G-4-209.   Default.
(1)  The presiding officer may enter an order of default against a party if:
(a)  a party in an informal adjudicative proceeding fails to participate in
the adjudicative proceeding;
(b)  a party to a formal adjudicative proceeding fails to attend or
participate in a properly scheduled hearing after receiving proper notice; or
(c)  a respondent in a formal adjudicative proceeding fails to file a response
under Section 63G-4-204.
(2)  An order of default shall include a statement of the grounds for default
and shall be mailed to all parties.
(3) (a)  A defaulted party may seek to have the agency set aside the default
order, and any order in the adjudicative proceeding issued subsequent to the
default order, by following the procedures outlined in the Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure.
(b)  A motion to set aside a default and any subsequent order shall be made to
the presiding officer.
(c)  A defaulted party may seek agency review under Section 63G-4-301, or
reconsideration under Section 63G-4-302, only on the decision of the presiding
officer on the motion to set aside the default.
(4) (a)  In an adjudicative proceeding begun by the agency, or in an
adjudicative proceeding begun by a party that has other parties besides the
party in default, the presiding officer shall, after issuing the order of
default, conduct any further proceedings necessary to complete the
adjudicative proceeding without the participation of the party in default and
shall determine all issues in the adjudicative proceeding, including those
affecting the defaulting party.
(b)  In an adjudicative proceeding that has no parties other than the agency
and the party in default, the presiding officer shall, after issuing the order
of default, dismiss the proceeding.
